Connecticut, session 2026, SB00314.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Agriculture
shall examine the need to establish standards for breeders of companion
animals used in medical research in the state. Such examination shall
include, but not be limited to, an assessment of the need to prohibit
hospitals, educational institutions and laboratories licensed for such
purpose from purchasing or using companion animals from any breeder
that has committed a direct or indirect violation of pet dealer-related
regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture. The
commissioner shall submit a report, including any legislative
recommendations, on such examination to the joint standing committee
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
environment not later than January 15, 2027, and in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
LCO No. 1417 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 314
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section